Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.160

Ballots—Processing, canvassing.

(1) The county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing board, shall process ballots and canvass the votes cast at that primary or election on a daily basis in counties with a population of seventy-five thousand or more, or at least every third day for counties with a population of less than seventy-five thousand, if the county auditor is in possession of more than five hundred ballots that have yet to be canvassed.

(2) Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted for purposes of this section.

(3) In order to protect the secrecy of a ballot, the county auditor may use discretion to decide when to process ballots and canvass the votes.

(4) Tabulation results must be made available to the public immediately upon completion of the canvass. Records of ballots counted must be made available to the public at the end of each day that the county auditor has processed ballots during and after an election.

[ 2016 c 134 s 2; 2013 c 11 s 62; 2011 c 10 s 53; (2011 c 10 s 52 expired July 1, 2013); 2007 c 373 s 2; (2007 c 373 s 1 expired July 1, 2013). Prior: 2005 c 243 s 15; (2005 c 153 s 11 expired July 1, 2013); 2003 c 111 s 1516; 1999 c 259 s 4; 1995 c 139 s 2; 1987 c 54 s 2; 1965 c 9 s 29.62.020; prior: 1957 c 195 s 15; prior: 1919 c 163 s 21, part; Code 1881 s 3095, part; 1868 p 20 s 1, part; 1865 p 39 s 6, part; RRS s 5340, part. Formerly RCW 29.62.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 10 ss 53 and 58: "Sections 53 and 58 of this act take effect July 1, 2013." [ 2011 c 10 s 88.]

Expiration date—2011 c 10 ss 52 and 57: "Sections 52 and 57 of this act expire July 1, 2013." [ 2011 c 10 s 89.]

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—2007 c 373 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2013." [ 2007 c 373 s 5.]

Expiration date—2007 c 373 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2013." [ 2007 c 373 s 4.]

Expiration date—2005 c 153 ss 11 and 12: "Sections 11 and 12 of this act expire July 1, 2013." [ 2005 c 153 s 14.]

Absentee ballots, canvassing: RCW 29A.40.110.